Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1433.01
Major out-of-state
contributor, defined.

Major out-of-state contributor
means a corporation, union, industry association, trade association, or professional
association which is not organized under the laws of the State of Nebraska
and which makes contributions or expenditures totaling more than ten thousand dollars in any calendar year in connection with
one or more elections.

Laws 1997, LB 49, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 23.